Utah statutes.
13-10b-401.   Law enforcement functions exempt.
This part does not prohibit any lawful investigation or collection of evidence
by a federal, state, or local law enforcement or investigative agency by means
of any audiovisual recording device used in a motion picture theater as part
of investigative, protective, or law enforcement functions.
